Washington statutes.
RCW 41.37.270

Vested membership.

A member who separates or has separated after having completed at least five years of service may remain a member during the period of the member's absence from service for the exclusive purpose only of receiving a retirement allowance under RCW 41.37.210 if the member maintains the member's accumulated contributions intact.

[ 2004 c 242 s 33.]